New Jersey, session 222, S3304.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.165 (C.2C:11-5.3) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  Criminal homicide constitutes strict liability vehicular homicide when it is caused by driving a vehicle while intoxicated in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or operating a vessel under the influence of alcohol or drugs in violation of section 3 of P.L.1952, c.157 (C.12:7-46). b.    Strict liability vehicular homicide is a crime of the [third] second degree, but the presumption of nonimprisonment set forth in subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:44-1 shall not apply. c.     The provisions of N.J.S.2C:2-3 governing the causal relationship between conduct and result shall not apply in a prosecution under this section.  For purposes of this offense, the defendant's act of operating a motor vehicle while intoxicated in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or operating a vessel under the influence of alcohol or drugs in violation of section 3 of P.L.1952, c.157 (C.12:7-46) is the cause of death when: (1)   The operation of the motor vehicle or vessel is an antecedent but for which the death would not have occurred; and (2)   The death was not: (a)   too remote in its occurrence as to have a just bearing on the defendant's liability; or (b)   too dependent upon the conduct of another person which was unrelated to the defendant's operation of a motor vehicle or vessel as to have a just bearing on the defendant's liability. d.    It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section that the decedent contributed to his own death by reckless or negligent conduct or operation of a motor vehicle or vessel. e.     Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preclude, if the evidence so warrants, an indictment and conviction for any other offense. (cf: P.L.2017, c.165, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.